test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s12_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - boyggja: # 
    boyggja+V+Inf: boyggja
    boyggja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: boyggir
    boyggja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: boygdi
    boyggja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: boygdu
    boyggja+V+Sup: boygt
    boyggja+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: boygdur
